New York, session 2025-2026, A2515.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 240 of the vehicle and traffic law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph h to read as follows: 3 h. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation, in 4 a city with a population of one million or more, one traffic violation 5 bureau office, at its principal place of business, shall make available 6 hearing examiners to conduct hearings until 7:00 p.m. one evening each 7 week. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03898-01-5